Illinois, session 104th, SB641.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The River Edge Redevelopment Zone Act is 5amended by changing Section 10-1 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 115/10-1)7    Sec. 10-1. This Article may be cited as the the River Edge 8Redevelopment Zone Act, and references in this Article to 9"this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 94-1021, eff. 7-12-06.)